Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.233

Guardianship for dependent child—Modification or termination of order—Hearing—Termination of guardianship.

(1) Any party may request the court under RCW 13.34.150 to modify or terminate a dependency guardianship order. Notice of any motion to modify or terminate the guardianship shall be served on all other parties, including any agency that was responsible for supervising the child's placement at the time the guardianship petition was filed. Notice in all cases shall be served upon the department. If the department was not previously a party to the guardianship proceeding, the department shall nevertheless have the right to: (a) Initiate a proceeding to modify or terminate a guardianship; and (b) intervene at any stage of such a proceeding.

(2) The guardianship may be modified or terminated upon the motion of any party, or the department if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that there has been a substantial change of circumstances subsequent to the establishment of the guardianship and that it is in the child's best interest to modify or terminate the guardianship. The court shall hold a hearing on the motion before modifying or terminating a guardianship.

(3) Upon entry of an order terminating the guardianship, the dependency guardian shall not have any rights or responsibilities with respect to the child and shall not have legal standing to participate as a party in further dependency proceedings pertaining to the child. The court may allow the child's dependency guardian to attend dependency review proceedings pertaining to the child for the sole purpose of providing information about the child to the court.

(4) Upon entry of an order terminating the guardianship, the child shall remain dependent and the court shall either return the child to the child's parent or order the child into the custody, control, and care of the department for placement in a foster home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or in a home not required to be licensed pursuant to such chapter. The court shall not place a child in the custody of the child's parent unless the court finds that reasons for removal as set forth in RCW 13.34.130 no longer exist and that such placement is in the child's best interest. The court shall thereafter conduct reviews as provided in RCW 13.34.138 and, where applicable, shall hold a permanency planning hearing in accordance with RCW 13.34.145.

[ 2018 c 284 s 23; 2009 c 520 s 38; 2000 c 122 s 30; 1995 c 311 s 24; 1994 c 288 s 8; 1981 c 195 s 4.]